New Jersey, session 222, S2100.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Education shall study the need for, and the advisability of, increasing the curriculum requirements for the study of geography in high school.  The study shall include an evaluation of the potential positive and negative consequences associated with enhancing the geography education requirements. b.    The commissioner shall report his findings and recommendations within 6 months of the effective date of this act to the State Board of Education, the Governor, and the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.